Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-106.02
Relinquishment of child; presentation of nonconsent form required.

Prior to the relinquishment of a child for adoption, a representative of the Department of Health and Human Services or of any child placement agency licensed by the department or an attorney and a witness shall present a copy or copies of the nonconsent form as provided in section 43-146.06 to the relinquishing parent or parents and explain the effects of signing such form.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 112;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 20.